Massachusetts, session 194th, H2357.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4.1 of article IV of the charter of the town of Sandwich, as
appearing in section 2 of chapter 22 of the acts of 2014, is hereby amended by striking out the
words "a town clerk;".
SECTION 2. Said article IV of said charter, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out section 4.5 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 4.5 TOWN CLERK
of 2

There shall be an appointed town clerk. The position of town clerk shall be that of a
department head appointed in accordance with the process used for appointing other department
heads.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the position of
elected town clerk in the town of Sandwich shall be abolished upon the effective date of this act
and the term of the elected incumbent terminated; provided, however, that the elected incumbent
shall then become the first appointed town clerk and shall serve in that capacity for a period of
time equivalent to the remainder of the elected term or sooner resignation, retirement or removal.
Thereafter, appointments to the position of town clerk shall be made pursuant to section 4.5 of
article IV of the charter of the town of Sandwich.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2